Maine, session 132, LD63.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 1 - 132LR0266(03)

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the required state share component of
reimbursement to state-licensed mental health organizations participating in the federal
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Medicaid Demonstration program under
the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,000,000 $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,836,454 $18,107,487 $19,275,103
__________ __________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $5,836,454 $18,107,487 $19,275,103
TOTAL
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $181,750 $563,875 $600,235
__________ __________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $181,750 $563,875 $600,235
TOTAL
Mental Health Services - Community Z198
Initiative: Deappropriates one-time funding provided under Public Law 2023, chapter 643,
Part A for the start-up and implementation costs of mental health organizations
participating in certified community behavioral health clinic projects previously funded by
federal grants from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Substance
Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration.
GENERAL FUND 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($2,000,000) $0 $0
__________ __________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL ($2,000,000) $0 $0
HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2024-25 2025-26 2026-27
GENERAL FUND $0 $0 $0
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES $5,836,454 $18,107,487 $19,275,103
FUND
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT $181,750 $563,875 $600,235
FUND
Page 2 - 132LR0266(03)

__________ __________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL $6,018,204 $18,671,362 $19,875,338
FUNDS
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 3 - 132LR0266(03)